South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5400.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 4-10-470 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (G)(1) The Education Capital Improvements Sales and Use Tax authorized by this article also may be imposed in a county which does not meet the collection requirements of subsection (A) so long as the county in which the tax is to be imposed: (a) has two school districts which encompasses the entire county area in which the tax is to be imposed; and (b) imposes no taxes pursuant to this chapter at the time of the referendum. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, if the Education Capital Improvements Sales and Use Tax is imposed pursuant to this subsection, then: (a) ten percent of the proceeds must be used to provide property tax relief by using the proceeds to offset the existing debt service millage levy on general obligation bonds pursuant to Section 4-10-445; and (b) the tax revenue distributed to each district must be in the proportion agreed to and reflected in the resolution required pursuant to Section 4-10-425. (3) The resolution required pursuant to Section 4-10-425 must be agreed to by a majority vote of the board of trustees of each school district located in the county. (4) Once a county meets the provisions of item (1) and imposes the Education Capital Improvements Sales and Use Tax, it thereafter remains eligible to impose this tax pursuant to this subsection. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----